Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1802
Joslyn Castle Trust Fund; created; use; investment.

There is hereby created the Joslyn Castle Trust Fund to be administered by the Department of Administrative Services. The fund shall consist of such sums as are contributed as gifts, grants, or bequests. The fund shall be used only for the operation, administration, maintenance, restoration, and renovation of Joslyn Castle. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1990, LB 164, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 82-134;

Laws 1993, LB 321, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 75.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.